Washington statutes.
RCW 41.58.080

Organizing petitions—Electronic signatures.

(1) For any new organizing petition to form a new bargaining unit of currently unrepresented workers or to add unrepresented workers to an existing bargaining unit, regardless of whether the election is by mail ballot or cross-check, the public employment relations commission must accept electronic signatures, subject to the requirements set forth in this section and by rules adopted by the commission.

(2) At a minimum, electronic signature submissions must include:

(a) The name of the signer;

(b) The phone number, email address, or social media account of the signer;

(c) The exact authorization language to which the signer assents;

(d) The date of submission of the electronic signature; and

(e) The name of the signer's employer.

(3) The petitioning party must provide a declaration that:

(a) Identifies the technology used to obtain and verify the signature;

(b) Provides the methods used to ensure the authenticity of the signature; and

(c) Confirms the information transmitted to the signer was the same information to which the signer assented.

(4) The public employment relations commission must adopt rules to implement this section.

[ 2024 c 98 s 1.]